New Jersey, session 222, S2153.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    It shall be an unlawful practice for any person to charge a mandatory gratuity in a restaurant without disclosing, in a prominent manner, the gratuity on the menu, at the entrance of the restaurant, on a patrons bill, and if applicable, on the restaurants website. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment.